Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-133
Exchange abandonment.

An existing telephone exchange or central office shall not be abandoned or removed to another city or village except by the written consent of at least sixty percent of the subscribers who had rental service contracts with the telecommunications company which seeks to change service six months before an application to change telecommunications service is filed with the commission. The commission shall hold a hearing and issue an order before the change is effected.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VI, § 11, p. 1421;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 107;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 75-611;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 32.